Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2513
Physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities, defined.

Physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities means modalities that produce a biophysiological response through the use of water, temperature, sound, electricity, or mechanical devices.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 853;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 10.